Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-128
Replacement bond; issuance; procedure.

Each replacement bond or other evidence of indebtedness shall be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the issuer and shall be executed by the then appropriate officers thereof.

Laws 1971, LB 873, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 924, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 9.